Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-1712
Financial institution, defined.

Financial institution shall mean a bank, savings institution, or trust company organized under, or supervised pursuant to, the laws of the United States or of any state.

Laws 1987, LB 575, § 12.